Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4133.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Department of Education, on behalf of the State of Oregon, shall
elect to participate in the federal program that allows tax credits for contributions by indi-
viduals to scholarship granting organizations, as provided by section 70411 of Public Law
119-21.
(2) The department shall:
(a) No later than January 1 of each year, produce a list of scholarship granting organ-
izations in this state that meet the requirements described in section 70411(c)(5) of Public
Law 119-21, and:
(A) Submit the list to the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States; and
(B) Publish the list on the department’s website.
(b) Certify that the department has the authority to submit the list on behalf of the State
of Oregon, as provided by this section.
(c) Accept applications from scholarship granting organizations throughout the year for
inclusion on the list produced pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “eligible workforce training programs” means
programs that meet applicable requirements in section 83002 of Public Law 119-21.
(2) The Governor, in consultation with the State Workforce and Talent Development
Board, shall approve all workforce training programs that meet the requirements of an eli-
gible workforce training program.
(3) The State Workforce and Talent Development Board shall:
(a) Coordinate approval of eligible workforce training programs with other state and
federal workforce or training programs.
(b) Align and leverage available state and federal funds to support the implementation
and expansion of eligible workforce training programs.
SECTION 3. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 267

HB 4133
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.

[2]